Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.030

Private schools—Actions appealable under Administrative Procedure Act.

Any private school may appeal the actions of the state board of education as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2018 c 177 s 202; 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 215 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.02.230.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2018 c 177 ss 201, 202, 501-504, 507, and 701: See note following RCW 28A.150.222.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.